Illinois, session 104th, SB1263.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 2-101 and by adding Section 2-106.5 as 6follows: 7    (210 ILCS 45/2-101)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4152-101)8    Sec. 2-101. No resident shall be deprived of any rights, 9benefits, or privileges guaranteed by State or federal law, 10the Constitution of the State of Illinois, or the Constitution 11of the United States solely on account of his or her status as 12a resident of a facility. Residents shall have the right to be 13treated with courtesy and respect by employees or persons 14providing medical services or care and shall have their human 15and civil rights maintained in all aspects of medical care as 16defined in the State Operations Manual for Long-Term Care 17Facilities. In accordance with 42 CFR 483.10, residents shall 18have their basic human needs, including, but not limited to, 19water, food, medication, toileting, and personal hygiene, and 20outdoor access, accommodated in a timely manner, as defined by 21the person and agreed upon by the interdisciplinary team. 22Residents have the right to maintain their autonomy as much as 23possible.  SB1263- 2 -LRB104 06083 BAB 16116 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1080, eff. 1-1-23.) 2    (210 ILCS 45/2-106.5 new)3    Sec. 2-106.5. Right to enter and leave a facility. A 4resident shall be free to enter and leave the facility as the 5resident chooses. A nursing home may suspend this right only 6if the resident's physician examines the resident and 7determines that leaving the facility would pose a danger to 8other residents or an immediate and substantial danger to the 9resident's safety and well-being. The physician shall explain 10to the resident why the resident's right to enter and leave the 11facility is being suspended, and the reason shall be 12documented in the resident's medical chart. 13    Section 10. The Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation 14Act of 2013 is amended by changing Section 3-101 as follows: 15    (210 ILCS 49/3-101)16    Sec. 3-101. Consumers' rights. Consumers served by a 17facility under this Act shall have all the rights guaranteed 18pursuant to Chapter II, Article I of the Mental Health and 19Developmental Disabilities Code. Additionally, a consumer has 20the right to enter and leave the facility as the consumer 21chooses, unless the consumer's physician examines the consumer 22and determines that leaving the facility would pose a danger 23to other consumers or an immediate and substantial danger to   SB1263- 3 -LRB104 06083 BAB 16116 b1the consumer's safety and well-being. The physician shall 2explain to the consumer why the consumer's right to enter and 3leave the facility is being suspended, and the reason shall be 4documented in the consumer's medical chart. , a list of which 5All consumers' rights shall be prominently posted in English 6and any other language representing at least 5% of the county 7population in which the specialized mental health 8rehabilitation facility is located.9(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13.)